Hawaii statutes.
§508D-4 Prohibitions on sales of
residential real property. Except as provided in section 508D-3, no seller
may sell residential real property unless:

(1) Prior to the sale of such residential real
property, a disclosure statement is:

(A) Signed and dated by the seller within six
months before or ten calendar days after the acceptance of a real estate
purchase contract by the buyer; and

(B) Delivered to the buyer as provided in
section 508D-5;

(2) The buyer acknowledges receipt of the disclosure
statement on the real estate purchase contract or in any addendum attached to
the contract, or in a separate document; and

(3) The buyer is afforded the opportunity to examine
the disclosure statement as provided in section 508D-5. [L 1994, c 214, pt of
§2; am L 1996, c 161, §4]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next